Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-907.03
Secretary of State Administration Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Secretary of State Administration Cash Fund. The fund shall consist of revenue received to defray costs as authorized in sections 25-3308 and 84-901 to 84-908. The revenue shall be collected by the Secretary of State and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be used to (1) offset expenses incurred as a result of sections 84-901 to 84-908, (2) administer the Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents Act, and (3) administer the Nonrecourse Civil Litigation Act.

Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 148;

Laws 2003, LB 228, § 15;

Laws 2009, LB292, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB1094, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB280, § 4.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.

Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents Act, see section 48-2601.

Nonrecourse Civil Litigation Act, see section 25-3301.